Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5664.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5501. As used in this part: (a) "Air contaminant" means a dust, fume, gas, mist, odor, smoke, vapor, or any combination thereof. (b) "Air pollution" means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of air contaminants in quantities, of characteristics, under conditions, and circumstances, and of a duration that are or can become injurious to human health or welfare, to animal life, to plant life, or to property, or that interfere with the enjoyment of life and property in this state. Air pollution does not mean any health or safety hazard that is an aspect of employer-employee relationships. With respect to any mode of transportation, nothing in this part or in the rules promulgated under this part shall be inconsistent with the federal regulations, emission limits, standards, or requirements on various modes of transportation. Air pollution does not mean those usual and ordinary odors associated with a farm operation if the person engaged in the farm operation is following generally accepted agricultural and management practices. (c) "Air pollution control equipment" means any method, process, or equipment that removes, reduces, or renders less noxious air contaminants discharged into the atmosphere. (d) "Carbon dioxide capture project" or "capture project" means a project or facility that uses equipment to capture a significant quantity of carbon dioxide directly from the ambient air or uses a process to separate carbon dioxide from industrial or energy-related sources, other than oil or gas production from a well. (e) "Carbon dioxide stream" means carbon dioxide, any incidental associated substances derived from the carbon dioxide source materials and the process of producing or capturing carbon dioxide, and any substance added to enable or improve the injection of the carbon dioxide stream into a well or the detection of a leak or rupture. (f) (d) "Category A facility" means a fee-subject facility that is an electric provider and is any of the following: (i) A major stationary source as defined in 42 USC 7602. (ii) An affected source as defined pursuant to in 42 USC 7651a. (iii) A major stationary source as defined in 42 USC 7491. (g) (e) "Category B facility" means a fee-subject facility that is not an electric provider and is any of the following: (i) A major stationary source as defined in 42 USC 7602. (ii) An affected source as defined pursuant to 42 USC 7651a. (iii) A major stationary source as defined in 42 USC 7491. (h) (f) "Category C facility" means a fee-subject facility that is not a category A or category B facility and that is a major source as defined in 42 USC 7412. (i) (g) "Category D facility" means a fee-subject facility that is not a category A, category B, or category C facility and that is subject to requirements of 42 USC 7411. However, a source is not a category D facility if any of the following apply: (i) All equipment at the source meets a permit to install exemption in R 336.1280 to R 336.1291 of the Michigan Administrative Code and does not have an active permit to install. (ii) The source is stripper well property as defined in 26 USC 613A(c)(6)(E). (j) (h) "Category E facility" means a fee-subject facility that is not a category A, category B, category C, or category D facility and that has an active title V opt-out permit. (k) (i) "Category F facility" means a fee-subject facility that is not a category A, category B, category C, category D, or category E facility. (l) (j) "Clean air act" means chapter 360, 69 Stat 322, 42 USC 7401 to 7671q, and regulations promulgated under the clean air act.thereunder. (m) "Criteria pollutant" means any pollutant for which the United States Environmental Protection Agency has set national ambient air quality standards under section 109 of the clean air act, 42 USC 7409, and recognized precursors to that pollutant. (n) (k) "Electric provider" means that term as defined in section 5 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1005. (o) (l) "Emission" means the emission of an air contaminant. (p) "Environmental justice community" means a geographic area that the department has identified as a community facing a disproportionate environmental burden, using the department's MiEJSCREEN or the United States Environmental Protection Agency's EJSCREEN and indicators such as sensitive populations, socioeconomic factors, exposures, and environmental effects. (q) (m) "Farm operation" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan right to farm act, 1981 PA 93, MCL 286.472. (r) (n) "Fee-subject air pollutant" means particulates, expressed as PM-10 pursuant to as defined in R 336.1116(k) of the Michigan Administrative Code, sulfur dioxide, volatile organic compounds, nitrogen oxides, ozone, lead, and any pollutant regulated under 42 USC 7411 or 7412 or title III of the clean air act, chapter 360, 77 Stat 400, 42 USC 7601 to 7628. (s) (o) "Fee-subject emissions" means emissions of fee-subject air pollutants. (t) (p) "Fee-subject facility" means the following sources: (i) Any A major source as defined in 40 CFR 70.2. (ii) Any A source, including an area source , subject to a standard, limitation, or other requirement under 42 USC 7411. , when the standard, limitation, or other requirement becomes applicable to that source. (iii) Any A source, including an area source , subject to a standard, limitation, or other requirement under 42 USC 7412. , when the standard, limitation, or other requirement becomes applicable to that source. However, a source is not a fee-subject facility solely because it is subject to a regulation, limitation, or requirement under 42 USC 7412(r). (iv) Any An affected source under title IV. (v) Any other source in a source category designated by the administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency as required to obtain an operating permit under title V, when the standard, limitation, or other requirement becomes applicable to that source. (vi) Any A source with an active title V opt-out permit. (u) (q) "Fund" means the emissions control fund created in section 5521. (v) (r) "General permit" means a permit to install, a permit to operate authorized issued pursuant to rules promulgated under section 5505(6), or an operating permit issued under section 5506, for a category of similar sources, processes, or process equipment. General provisions for issuance of general permits shall be provided for by rule. (w) (s) "Generally accepted agricultural and management practices" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan right to farm act, 1981 PA 93, MCL 286.472. (x) "Geologic storage" means that term as defined in section 65101. (y) (t) "Major emitting facility" means a stationary source that emits 100 tons or more per year of any of the following: (i) Particulates. (ii) Sulfur dioxides. (iii) Volatile organic compounds. (iv) Oxides of nitrogen. (z) (u) "Process", unless the context requires a different meaning, means an action, operation, or a series of actions or operations at a source that emits or has the potential to emit an air contaminant. (aa) (v) "Process equipment" means all equipment, devices, and auxiliary components, including air pollution control equipment, stacks, and other emission points, used in a process. (bb) (w) "Responsible official" means, for the purposes of signing and certifying as to the truth, accuracy, and completeness of permit applications, monitoring reports, and compliance certifications, any of the following: (i) For a corporation: a president, secretary, treasurer, or vice-president in charge of a principal business function, or any other person who performs similar policy or decision making functions for the corporation, or, if either of the following applies, an authorized representative of that person: if the (A) The representative is responsible for the overall operation of 1 or more manufacturing, production, or operating facilities applying for or subject to a permit under this part and either the facilities employ more than 250 persons or have annual sales or expenditures exceeding $25,000,000.00. , or if the (B) The delegation of authority to the representative is approved in advance by the department. (ii) For a partnership or sole proprietorship: a general partner or the proprietor. (iii) For a county or municipality or a state, federal, or other public agency: a principal executive officer or ranking elected official. For this purpose, the purposes of this subparagraph, a principal executive officer of a federal agency includes the chief executive officer having responsibility for the overall operations of a principal geographic unit of the agency. (iv) For sources affected by the acid rain program under title IV: the designated representative insofar as with respect to actions, standards, requirements, or prohibitions under that title are concerned.title IV. (cc) (x) "Schedule of compliance" means, for a source not in compliance with all applicable requirements of this part, rules promulgated under this part, and the clean air act at the time of issuance of an operating permit, a schedule of remedial measures including an enforceable sequence of actions or operations leading to compliance with an applicable requirement and a schedule for submission of certified progress reports at least every 6 months. Schedule of compliance means, for a source in compliance with all applicable requirements of this part, rules promulgated under this part, and the clean air act at the time of issuance of an operating permit, a statement that the source will continue to comply with these those requirements. With respect to any applicable requirement of this part, rules promulgated under this part, and the clean air act effective that takes effect after the date of issuance of an operating permit, the schedule of compliance shall contain a statement that the source will meet the requirements requirement on a timely basis, unless the underlying applicable requirement requires a more detailed schedule. (dd) (y) "Source" means a stationary source as defined in 42 USC 7602, and has the same meaning as stationary source when used in comparable or applicable circumstances under the clean air act. A source includes all the processes and process equipment under common control that are located within a contiguous area, or a smaller group of processes and process equipment as requested by the owner or operator of the source, if in accordance consistent with the clean air act. (ee) (z) "Title IV" means title IV IV-A of the clean air act, pertaining to acid deposition control, 42 USC 7651 to 7651o. (ff) (aa) "Title V" means title V of the clean air act, 42 USC 7661 to 7661f. (gg) (bb) "Title V opt-out permit" means a permit to install that includes all of the following: (i) Specified emission limits below thresholds for title V applicability. (ii) Operational restriction.restrictions. (iii) Monitoring or record-keeping requirements to make subparagraphs (i) and (ii) practically enforceable through a permit. (hh) "Total greenhouse gas emissions associated with capture" includes, but is not limited to, the following: (i) The emissions at the stack or emissions source from which the carbon dioxide is captured. (ii) The additional emissions associated with additional electricity generated, whether on-site or off-site, used to power any capture equipment. (iii) Any increased emissions necessary for the operation of the capture facility. Sec. 5505c. (1) A person shall not install a carbon dioxide capture project except as authorized by a permit to install issued by the department under section 5505. (2) The department may issue a permit described in subsection (1) only after providing public notice, including offering an opportunity for public comment and a public hearing on the draft permit, subject to the following: (a) Public notice shall be provided by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the area where the source is located or in a state publication designed to give general public notice, and by other means determined to be necessary by the department to ensure adequate notice to the public. Notice shall also be provided to persons on a mailing list, developed by the department, including those persons who request in writing to be on that list, and to any other person who requests in writing to be notified of a permit action involving the carbon dioxide capture project. (b) The notice shall identify the carbon dioxide capture project; the name and address of the responsible official; the mailing address of the department; the activity or activities involved in the proposed permit action or consent order; the name, address, and telephone number of a representative of the department from whom interested persons may obtain additional information, including copies of the draft permit, the application, all relevant supporting material, and any other materials available to the department that are relevant to the permit; a brief description of the comment procedures; and the time and place of any hearing that may be held, including a statement of the procedures to request a hearing. (c) The department shall provide at least 30 days for public comment and shall give notice of any public hearing at least 30 days in advance of the hearing. (d) The department shall keep a record of the persons who comment and the issues raised during the public comment period and public hearing, if held. The record shall be available to the public. (3) The department shall not approve an application for a permit for a capture project submitted on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, unless all of the following requirements are met: (a) The application demonstrates that there will be no net increase in the allowable potential annual emissions of any criteria pollutant at the source. (b) The application includes a greenhouse gas inventory analysis, as set forth in guidance from the United States Environmental Protection Agency. The greenhouse gas inventory analysis shall cover total greenhouse gas emissions associated with capture and include a demonstration that the total greenhouse gas emissions associated with capture do not exceed the total amount of greenhouse gas emissions captured. This comparison shall be made on an annual basis, projected across the proposed life span of the carbon dioxide capture project. (c) If the applicant is an electric provider, the application demonstrates that the carbon dioxide capture project is at least 90% effective in capturing carbon dioxide. (d) If the applicant is not an electric provider, the application demonstrates that the carbon dioxide capture project will meet the minimum carbon dioxide capture rate established under section 5505i. (e) The applicant has installed or will install any monitoring equipment the department considers necessary to ensure continued compliance with the permit and with any rules promulgated under this part. (f) The application identifies the end use or destination of all carbon dioxide streams from the proposed project. If those destinations include sequestration within this state, the carbon dioxide sequestration project must be permitted under part 651. Using carbon dioxide for enhanced oil recovery is not considered to be sequestration or another permissible end use or destination under this subdivision. (g) The application is accompanied by a fee in an amount necessary to process the application and administer this part, including creating the report required under section 5505e and the cost of promulgating rules required to implement this part. Fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the carbon dioxide sequestration fund created in section 65116. (4) The department may include in the permit reasonable conditions that the department considers necessary to safeguard the air quality of this state. Sec. 5505e. By 1 year after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section and every 3 years thereafter, the department shall submit to the governor and the legislature a report that reviews the progress on the implementation of carbon dioxide capture projects in this state. The department may obtain outside consultants to assist with the report. The report shall include, at minimum, the following: (a) A review of statutory or regulatory actions by other states or the federal government to establish and implement a minimum carbon dioxide capture rate at the stack or emission point. (b) A review of active and proposed capture projects in the United States, including the types of technology and carbon dioxide capture rates used by various industry subsectors to capture and store carbon. (c) An assessment of the technical and economic feasibility of carbon capture in various industries. (d) An environmental justice analysis that includes, but is not limited to, the following: (i) An assessment of carbon dioxide capture, transport, and sequestration projects that present potential impacts on environmental justice communities and economically disadvantaged rural communities. (ii) Options for state agencies and decision makers to improve environmental, public health, and economic protections for environmental justice communities and economically disadvantaged rural communities in permitting and regulatory enforcement of permit provisions of carbon dioxide capture, transport, and sequestration proposals. Sec. 5505g. (1) Based on the first report under section 5505e, the department may promulgate rules to implement sections 5505c to 5505i pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Subject to subsections (2) and (3), the rules shall establish a 90% minimum carbon dioxide capture rate for carbon dioxide capture projects. (2) The department may, by rule, set a minimum carbon dioxide capture rate for carbon dioxide capture projects for a particular industry that is greater than 90% if the most recent report under section 5505e demonstrates that the greater capture rate is technically feasible. (3) The department may set a minimum carbon dioxide capture rate, except for an electric provider or the electric provider industry, that is less than 90%, but not less than 80%, under either of the following circumstances: (a) By rule, for a particular industry, if the most recent report under section 5505e demonstrates that it is technically infeasible for carbon dioxide capture projects in that particular industry to meet the 90% capture rate. (b) In a permit for a particular major source if a facility-specific major source permitting analysis demonstrates that a capture rate of 90% is technically infeasible. Sec. 5505i. A person shall not use a carbon dioxide stream produced by a carbon dioxide capture project for enhanced oil or gas recovery or transport or sell such a carbon dioxide stream for such a use. Sec. 5530. (1) The attorney general may commence a civil action against a person for appropriate relief, including injunctive relief, and a civil fine as provided in subsection (2) for any of the following: (a) Violating this part or a rule promulgated under this part. (b) Failure to obtain a permit under this part. (c) Failure to comply with the terms of a permit or an order issued under this part. (d) Failure to pay an air quality fee or comply with a filing requirement under this part. (e) Failure to comply with the inspection, entry, and monitoring requirements of this part. (f) A violation described in section 5518(2). (2) In addition to any other relief authorized under this section, the court may impose a civil fine of not more than $10,000.00 for each instance of violation and, if the violation continues, for each day of continued violation. However, for a violation of sections 5505c to 5505i or a permit described in or an order issued or a rule promulgated under sections 5505c to 5505i, the court may impose a civil fine of not more than $50,000.00 for each instance of violation and, if the violation continues, for each day of continued violation. A civil fine collected for a violation of sections 5505c to 5505i or a permit described in or an order issued or a rule promulgated under sections 5505c to 5505i shall be deposited in the carbon dioxide sequestration fund created in section 65116. (3) In addition to other relief authorized under this section, the attorney general may, at the request of the department, file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover the full value of the injuries damage done to the natural resources of the state. (4) In issuing a final order in an action brought pursuant to this section, the court may award costs of litigation, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney and expert witness fees, to the prevailing or substantially prevailing party if the court determines that such an award is appropriate. (5) A civil action brought under this section may be brought in the county in which the defendant is located, resides, or is doing business, or in the circuit court for the county of Ingham, or in the county in which the registered office of a defendant corporation is located, or in the county where the violation occurred. (6) General defenses and affirmative defenses, that may otherwise apply under state law may apply in an action brought under this section as determined to be appropriate by a court of competent jurisdiction. (7) Fines imposed under this section shall be assessed for each instance of violation and, if the violation is continuous, shall be assessable up to the maximum amount for each day of violation. Sec. 5531. (1) A person who knowingly violates any requirement or prohibition of an applicable requirement of this part or a rule promulgated under this part or who fails to obtain or comply with a permit or comply with a final order or order of determination issued under this part is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000.00 per day, for each violation. (2) A person who knowingly makes a false material statement, representation, or certification in, or omits material information from, or knowingly alters, conceals, or fails to file any notice, application, record, report, plan, or other document required to be submitted pursuant to this part or a rule promulgated under this part, or who knowingly fails to notify or report information required to be submitted under this part or a rule promulgated under this part, or who knowingly falsifies, tampers with, renders inaccurate, or knowingly fails to install any monitoring device or method required under this part or a rule promulgated under this part, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year and a fine of not more than $10,000.00 per day, for each violation. (3) A person who knowingly fails to pay any air quality fee owed under this part is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000.00. (4) A person who knowingly releases into the ambient air any specific chemical or any hazardous air pollutant listed in 40 C.F.R. part 68, section CFR 68.130, (January 19, 1993) pursuant to the authority of section 112(r) of part A of title I of the clean air act, 84 Stat. 1685, 42 U.S.C. 42 USC 7412, or both, or releases from a carbon capture project into the ambient air captured carbon dioxide, contrary to applicable federal, state, or local requirements, or contrary to a permit issued under this part, and because of the quantities or concentrations of the substance released knows or should have known at the time that the release places another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (5) A person who knowingly releases or causes the release into the ambient air any specific chemical or any hazardous air pollutant listed in 40 C.F.R. part 68, section CFR 68.130, (January 19, 1993) pursuant to the authority of section 112(r) of part A of title I of the clean air act, 84 Stat. 1685, 42 U.S.C. 42 USC 7412, or both, or releases from a carbon capture project into the ambient air captured carbon dioxide, contrary to applicable federal, state, or local requirements, or contrary to a permit issued under this part, and who knows or should have known at the time that the release places another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury, and the release results in death or serious bodily injury to any person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 6 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both. (6) A person who knowingly releases into the ambient air any specific chemical or any hazardous air pollutant listed in 40 C.F.R. part 68, section CFR 68.130, (January 19, 1993) pursuant to the authority of section 112(r) of part A of title I of the clean air act, 84 Stat. 1685, 42 U.S.C. 42 USC 7412, or both, or releases from a carbon capture project into the ambient air captured carbon dioxide, contrary to applicable federal, state, or local requirements, or contrary to a permit issued under this part, and who intended at that time to place another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury, and whose actions do result in death or cause serious bodily injury to any person is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years or a fine of not more than $250,000.00, or both. (7) In determining whether a defendant who is an individual knew that the violation placed another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury as required under subsections (4), (5), and (6), the defendant is responsible only for actual awareness or actual belief possessed, and knowledge possessed by a person other than the defendant, but not by the defendant, may not be attributed to the defendant. However, in proving a defendant's possession of actual knowledge, circumstantial evidence may be used, including evidence that the defendant took affirmative steps to be shielded from relevant information. (8) Fines imposed under this section shall be assessed for each instance of violation and, if the violation is continuous, shall be assessable up to the maximum amount for each day of violation. (9) A defendant may establish an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section by showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the conduct charged was freely consented to by the person endangered and that the danger and conduct charged were reasonably foreseeable hazards of any of the following: (a) An occupation, a business, or a profession. (b) Medical treatment or medical or scientific experimentation conducted by professionally approved methods if the person had been made aware was informed of the risks involved prior to before giving consent. (10) All general defenses, affirmative defenses, and bars to prosecution that may otherwise apply with respect to state criminal offenses may apply under this section and shall be determined by the courts of this state having jurisdiction according to the principles of common law as they may be interpreted in the light of reason and experience. Concepts of justification and excuse applicable under this section may be developed by the courts in the light of reason and experience. (11) Fines shall not be imposed pursuant to this section for a violation that was caused by an act of God, war, strike, riot, catastrophe, or other condition to which negligence or willful misconduct on the part of the person was not the proximate cause. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Serious bodily injury" means bodily injury that involves a substantial risk of death, unconsciousness, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty. (b) "Specific chemical" means a hazardous air pollutant listed in section 112(b)(1) of Part A of title I of the clean air act, 84 Stat. 1685, 42 U.S.C.42 USC 7412, except for the following compounds: (i) Antimony compounds. (ii) Arsenic compounds (inorganic including arsine). (iii) Beryllium compounds. (iv) Cadmium compounds. (v) Chromium compounds. (vi) Cobalt compounds. (vii) Coke oven emissions. (viii) Cyanide compounds. (ix) Glycol ethers. (x) Lead compounds. (xi) Manganese compounds. (xii) Mercury compounds. (xiii) Fine mineral fibers. (xiv) Nickel compounds. (xv) Polycyclic organic matter. (xvi) Radionuclides (including radon). (xvii) Selenium compounds. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25) or House Bill No. 5669 (request no. H02796'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25 a) or House Bill No. 5665 (request no. H02796'25 a). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25 b) or House Bill No. 5666 (request no. H02796'25 b). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02796'25 c) or House Bill No. 5667 (request no. H02796'25 c). (e) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02798'25) or House Bill No. 5668 (request no. H02798'25).